Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 4. Deeds and Acknowledgments of Corporations.

§ 55.1-624.
Deeds of corporations; how to be executed and acknowledged.

All deeds made by corporations shall be signed in the name of the corporation by the president or acting president, or any vice-president, or by such other person as may be authorized to do so by the board of directors of such corporation, and, if such deed is to be recorded, the person signing the name of the corporation shall acknowledge such authority in the manner provided by §

55.1-625

.

History.

Code 1919, § 5208; 1920, p. 586; Code 1950, § 55-119; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 41; 1975, c. 500; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Powers, § 3.

§ 55.1-625.
Acknowledgments on behalf of corporations and others.

When any writing purports to have been signed on behalf or by authority of any person or corporation, or in any representative capacity whatsoever, the certificate of the acknowledgment by the person so signing the writing shall be sufficient for the purposes of this and §§

55.1-600

,

55.1-612

,

55.1-613

, and

55.1-615

, and for the recordation of such writing as to the person or corporation on whose behalf it is signed, or as to the representative character of the person so signing the writing, as the case may be, without expressing that such acknowledgment was on behalf or by authority of such other person or corporation or was in a representative capacity. In the case of a writing signed on behalf or by authority of any person or corporation or in any representative capacity, a certificate to the following effect shall be sufficient:

State (or territory or district) of , county (or city) of ,: I, , a (here insert the official title of the person certifying the acknowledgment) in and for the state (or territory or district) and county (or city) aforesaid, do certify that (here insert the name or names of the persons signing the writing on behalf of the person or corporation, or the name of the person signing the writing in a representative capacity), whose name (or names) is (or are) signed to the writing above, bearing date on the day of , has (or have) acknowledged the same before me in my county (or city) aforesaid. Given under my hand this day of .

Click to view

History.

Code 1919, § 5207; Code 1950, § 55-120; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-626.
Corporate acknowledgment taken before officer or stockholder.

Any notary or other officer duly authorized to take acknowledgments may take the acknowledgment to any deed or other writing executed by a company or to a company or for the benefit of a company, although he may be a stockholder, an officer, or both, in such company, provided that he is not otherwise interested in the property conveyed or disposed of by such deed or other writing, and nothing herein shall be construed to authorize any officer to take an acknowledgment to any deed or other writing executed by such company by and through him as an officer or stockholder of such company, or to him for the benefit of such company.

History.

Code 1919, § 5209; 1926, p. 340; Code 1950, § 55-121; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.